Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4893.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Clause (ll) of section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in
the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the clause and inserting in place
thereof the following:-
"(ll) Sales of (i) rare coins of numismatic value; (ii) gold or silver bullion or coins; or (iii)
gold or silver tender of any nation traded and sold according to its value as precious metal. The
word ''bullion'' shall not include fabricated precious metal which has been processed or
manufactured for industrial, professional or artistic uses.”
of 1